Kentucky, session 2025RS, SB167.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 247 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Agricultural land" has the same meaning as in 7 U.S.C. sec. 3508;
(b) "Fiduciary" has the same meaning as in KRS 131.010;
(c) "Foreign agent" has the same meaning as in 18 U.S.C. sec. 1839;
(d) "Foreign business" has the same meaning as in 26 C.F.R. sec. 301.7701-5;
(e) "Nonresident alien" has the same meaning as in 26 C.F.R. sec. 1.871-2;
and
(f) "Trustee" has the same meaning as in KRS 218A.405.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, except as provided in
subsections (3), (4), and (5) of this section, on or after the effective date of this
Act, a nonresident alien, foreign business, foreign agent, trustee, or fiduciary
who has a legal relationship with or is legally bound to take instruction from or
execute decisions for the government of any proscribed country referenced in 22
C.F.R. sec. 126.1, as amended, shall be prohibited from:
(a) The purchase, lease, or acquisition of any interest in public or private
agricultural land located in the Commonwealth of Kentucky; and
(b) Participation in programs administered by the Department of Agriculture,
Agricultural Development Board, and Kentucky Agricultural Finance
Corporation.
(3) Any agricultural land purchased, leased, or acquired by a nonresident alien,
foreign business, foreign agent, trustee, or fiduciary who has a legal relationship
with or is legally bound to take instruction from or execute decisions for the
government of any proscribed country referenced in 22 C.F.R. sec. 126.1, as
Page 1 of 4
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:24 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1768
amended, prior to the effective date of this Act may continue to own or hold the
agricultural land, but shall not purchase, lease, or acquire any additional
agricultural land or interest in agricultural land in this Commonwealth.
(4) Nothing in this section shall prohibit:
(a) An existing foreign business who has a legal relationship with or is legally
bound to take instruction from or execute decisions for the government of
any proscribed country referenced in 22 C.F.R. sec. 126.1, as amended,
located in the Commonwealth, from purchasing, leasing, or acquiring
agricultural land adjacent to the land that the foreign business owns and
operates in order to expand the operation of its business; and
(b) A nonresident alien, foreign business, foreign agent, trustee, or fiduciary
who has a legal relationship with or is legally bound to take instruction
from or execute decisions for the government of any proscribed country
referenced in 22 C.F.R. sec. 126.1, as amended, from the purchase, lease, or
acquisition of up to three hundred fifty (350) acres of agricultural land for
agricultural research and development or experimental purposes, including
testing, development, or production of any crop production inputs for sale
or resale to farmers, including but not limited to seeds, plants, pesticides,
soil amendments, biologicals, or fertilizers.
(5) A nonresident alien, foreign business, foreign agent, trustee, or fiduciary may
own, purchase, hold, or develop agricultural land for immediate or potential
nonagricultural use in an amount necessary for the conduct of its
nonagricultural business operation, including the filing of any permit or
application to any state or federal agency having jurisdiction over the project for
permitting purposes, provided that:
(a) Development of the nonagricultural business operation has been completed
within five (5) years from acquiring the land. Failure to develop the land
Page 2 of 4
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:24 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1768
within that time shall be deemed a violation of this section; and
(b) The agricultural land shall not be used for farming, except under lease to a
family farm unit, family farm corporation, or an authorized farm
corporation, pending the development of the agricultural land for a
nonagricultural use.
(6) Nothing in this section shall exempt a nonresident alien, foreign business,
foreign agent, trustee, or fiduciary who has a legal relationship with or is legally
bound to take instruction from or execute decisions for the government of any
proscribed country referenced in 22 C.F.R. sec. 126.1, as amended, from:
(a) The provisions of the Agricultural Foreign Investment Disclosure Act, 7
U.S.C. sec. 3501 et seq., and its accompanying regulations at 7 C.F.R. pt.
781 et seq. or any amendments thereto; and
(b) Filing a copy of the required report pursuant to 7 U.S.C. sec. 3501 et seq.
and its accompanying regulations at 7 C.F.R. pt. 781 et seq., or amendments
thereto, with the Department of Agriculture within the time period specified
therein.
(7) The Department of Agriculture shall review any report:
(a) Received in accordance with subsection (6) of this section; and
(b) Voluntarily submitted by a county register of deeds alleging a violation of
this section.
(8) If the Department of Agriculture has reason to believe that a violation of this
section may have occurred, the department shall refer evidence of noncompliance
to the Office of the Attorney General, who shall investigate the evidence for
violations of this section. The Office of the Attorney General may bring an action
pursuant to KRS Chapter 15 to enforce the provisions of this section.
(9) (a) If the court finds that agricultural land has been purchased or acquired in
violation of this section, then the court shall declare the agricultural land
Page 3 of 4
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:24 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1768
escheated to the state and order the sale of the agricultural land in the
manner provided by law for the judicial foreclosure of a mortgage on real
estate for default of payment. After the Office of the Attorney General has
been reimbursed for all actual costs incurred from the enforcement of this
provision, the proceeds of the sale of the agricultural land pursuant to this
paragraph through judicial foreclosure shall be disbursed in the following
order:
1. Payment of delinquent ad valorem taxes;
2. Payment to mortgage and other lien holders, in the priority determined
by the court; and
3. Deposit in the budget reserve trust fund.
(b) If the court finds that agricultural land has been leased in violation of this
section, then the court shall rescind the lease and it shall be rendered null
and void.
Page 4 of 4
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:24 PM Jacketed